Utah statutes.
63M-5-301.   State Board of Education and Department of Transportation to
prepare budget and submit to governor.
The State Board of Education and the Department of Transportation shall
prepare and submit to the governor, to be included in the governor's budget to
the Legislature, a budget of the requirements for carrying out the provisions
of this chapter.
